Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 3
LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL

2-3-301. Legislative council created - executive committee created.

There is hereby created a legislative council, referred to in this part 3 as the "council", which consists of an executive committee, six senators with majority party members appointed by the president of the senate and minority party members appointed by the minority leader of the senate, with the approval of a majority vote of the members elected to the senate, and six representatives with majority party members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and minority party members appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives, with the approval of a majority vote of the members elected to the house of representatives. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1.5) of this section, the executive committee consists of the president of the senate, the majority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the majority leader of the house of representatives, and the minority leader of the house of representatives, all of whom are ex officio members of the council. The speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall alternately serve as the chair and vice-chair of the executive committee and serve for one-year terms. All ex officio members of the council have and may exercise all the powers, privileges, and duties of other members.

(1.5) (a) In order to expedite the work of the executive committee, for each period commencing after a general election and ending following the convening of the next general assembly when a new executive committee is formed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, a temporary executive committee comprised of the legislators selected by their respective party caucuses as the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the majority and minority leaders of the senate and the house of representatives for the next general assembly shall be formed.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1.5), the temporary executive committee shall assume all of the duties and powers of the executive committee previously formed in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

The executive committee previously formed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall retain all powers and duties related to any special session of the general assembly called prior to the convening of the next general assembly and all legislative management functions pertaining to matters arising prior to the convening of the next general assembly.

Each member of the temporary executive committee shall have the same powers and duties with respect to the business of the temporary executive committee as all other members of the temporary executive committee, whether the member is a member of the then current general assembly, a member-elect of the next general assembly, or both.

Appointments or reappointments of all members of the council shall be made no later than ten days after the convening of the first regular session of each general assembly. An appointing authority may make an appointment to temporarily replace a current member of the committee appointed by that appointing authority; except that a temporary appointment does not require approval of a majority of the members elected to the applicable body. Membership on the council terminates with the appointment of a member's successor or upon the termination of a member's term of office in the general assembly, whichever first occurs. A member may be appointed to succeed himself or herself.

(2.5) An ex officio member of the council may make an appointment to temporarily replace himself or herself at a meeting of the council. A member temporarily appointed under this subsection (2.5) shall not replace the ex officio member at a meeting of the executive committee.

The party representation on the council shall be in proportion generally to the relative number of members of the two major political parties in each house of the general assembly, but in no event shall a minority party be represented by less than one council member from the senate and two council members from the house of representatives.

Vacancies in the membership of the council shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments are made.

The legislative council may be a committee of reference for bills and joint resolutions that allocate any additional legislative staff resources.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 335, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 63-5-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-1.

L. 69:

p. 461, § 3.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2102, § 1, effective June 9.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 408, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2001:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1216, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(1.5)(c) amended, p. 1982, § 3, effective May 22.

L. 2013:

(5) added, (HB 13-1299), ch. 382, p. 2242, § 4, effective June 5.

L. 2016:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 16-156), ch. 282, p. 1155, § 2, effective June 10.

L. 2019:

(2.5) added, (HB 19-1173), ch. 92, p. 339, § 1, effective August 2.

2-3-302. Organization - meetings.

The chair and vice-chair of the executive committee shall serve as the chair and vice-chair of the council; and the council shall prescribe its own rules of procedure, and may appoint subcommittees from the membership of the general assembly and other persons to assist in carrying out its functions.

The council shall meet as often as may be necessary to perform its functions, but it shall not meet less frequently than once in each quarter of the calendar year.

Nine members shall constitute a quorum, and a majority thereof, or of the number of members present if more than a quorum, shall have authority to act on any matter within the jurisdiction of the council.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 336, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 63-5-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-2.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2103, § 2, effective June 9.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 409, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-156), ch. 282, p. 1155, § 3, effective June 10.

2-3-303. Functions - report - definitions.

In addition to any other powers and duties set forth in law, the council shall have the following powers and duties:

To collect information concerning the government and general welfare of the state;

To examine the effects of constitutional provisions and statutes and recommend desirable alterations;

To consider important issues of public policy and questions of statewide interest;

To prepare for presentation to the members and various sessions of the general assembly such reports, bills, or otherwise, as the welfare of the state may require;

To expend moneys or authorize the expenditure of moneys to accomplish the functions contained in this section out of moneys appropriated to the council by the general assembly;

To approve bills recommended by interim legislative council committees or other committees created by statute or resolution which operate during the interim;

To review the ballot information booklet prepared by the director of research at a public hearing in accordance with section 1-40-124.5, C.R.S.

In addition to any other powers and duties set forth in law, the executive committee of the legislative council has the following powers and duties:

To consider, recommend, and establish policies relating to legislative management and legislative procedures, including but not limited to deadlines for the legislative session, guidelines on the format of bills, allocation of space in the capitol for legislative purposes, and lobbying practices;

To consider and approve the budget requests from the legislative service agency directors for the legislative service agencies;

To prepare and introduce the legislative appropriation bill each year;

To establish policies about the retention of records by the legislative service agencies of the general assembly, including the retention of records relating to legislative review of rules and regulations promulgated by executive branch agencies pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

To coordinate the televising via cable television and webcast of proceedings of the house of representatives and the senate with the Colorado channel authority created in article 49.9 of title 24, C.R.S.;

To consider, recommend, and establish policies allowing legislative committees to take remote testimony from government officials and employees as well as other members of the public.

and (III) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

(IV) Nothing in this subsection (2)(g) supersedes the power of the house of representatives or the senate to adopt rules or joint rules, or both, for the orderly conduct of their affairs.

(V) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

The power to allow members of the general assembly to participate electronically in legislative proceedings and to recommend, develop, and establish policies regarding electronic participation if so allowed; except that, if allowed, electronic participation must only be allowed for:

Committee meetings occurring during the legislative interim; or

Legislative proceedings, including floor proceedings, committee meetings or hearings, and other legislative business occurring during a disaster emergency declared by the governor in accordance with section 24-33.5-704 that is caused by a public health emergency infecting or exposing a great number of people to disease, agents, toxins, or other such threats.

A member participating electronically in a committee meeting pursuant to subsection (2)(h)(I)(A) of this section is deemed to be in attendance of that committee for the purpose of receiving compensation to which the member is entitled under section 2-2-307 (3). Notwithstanding section 2-2-307 (3)(b), members participating electronically are not entitled to reimbursement for any expenses incurred in connection with such electronic participation.

A member participating electronically in a legislative proceeding pursuant to subsection (2)(h)(I)(B) of this section is not entitled to reimbursement for any expenses incurred in connection with such electronic participation; except that, if the member cannot participate electronically from the member's home due to a technological limitation or incapacity at that location, the member may receive reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred to travel to an alternate location in order to participate electronically. A request for reimbursement under this subsection (2)(h)(III) is subject to the guidelines for reimbursement and substantiation requirements established by the executive committee of the legislative council in accordance with section 2-2-317 (2)(c), and the amount of reimbursement must not exceed the amount the member would customarily receive for travel expenses under section 2-2-317 (2)(a) or (2)(b).

Nothing in this subsection (2)(h) supersedes the power of the senate or the house of representatives to adopt rules or joint rules, or both, for the orderly conduct of its affairs.

In addition to the powers and duties specified in subsection (2) of this section, the executive committee of the legislative council shall annually approve a salary pay range to be used in setting the salaries of the legislative service agency directors.

The legislative audit committee, the joint budget committee, the legislative council, and the committee on legal services shall each submit an annual report to the executive committee evaluating the performance of the legislative service agency director under such committee's supervision.

Upon review of the reports received pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), the executive committee shall evaluate the performance of legislative service agency directors and determine the salaries to be paid thereto.

The executive committee shall appoint legislative service agency directors, other than the state auditor, after receiving recommendations thereon from the respective committees.

The executive committee shall consult with the legislative audit committee concerning the appointment of a state auditor before the legislative audit committee places the names of candidates before the general assembly in accordance with section 2-3-101 (3)(a).

The executive committee shall annually approve salary pay ranges to be used in determining the salaries of the staffs of legislative service agencies. Legislative service agency directors shall determine the salaries to be paid to their respective staffs in accordance with such pay ranges; except that employees of the office of the state auditor who are within the state personnel system shall be paid in accordance with article 50 of title 24, C.R.S. Each legislative service agency director shall file a report annually with the executive committee setting forth the salaries paid to their respective staffs.

Any senator or representative or any legislative committee may provide the executive committee or any legislative service agency director with information or recommendations concerning pay ranges or performance evaluations for legislative service agency directors or the staffs of legislative service agencies.

As used in this subsection (3), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Legislative service agencies" means the office of the state auditor, the joint budget committee staff, the legislative council staff, and the office of legislative legal services.

"Legislative service agency director" means the state auditor, the staff director of the joint budget committee, the director of research of the legislative council, and the director of the office of legislative legal services.

The executive committee has the power and responsibility to:

Perform legislative management functions when the general assembly is not in session; and

Set the date for convening the next regular session of the general assembly as provided in section 2-2-303.5 (4).

Source:

L. 53:

p. 336, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 63-5-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-3.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2103, § 3, effective June 9.

L. 94:

(4) amended, p. 580, § 3, effective April 7; (2)(e) added, p. 1836, § 3, effective June 1; (1)(g) amended, p. 1689, § 4, effective January 19, 1995.

L. 2000:

(2)(e) repealed, p. 22, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2009:

(2)(f) added, (HB 09-1307), ch. 283, p. 1291, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

IP(2) amended and (2)(g) added, (HB 14-1303), ch. 289, p. 1183, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(2)(h) added, (HB 17-1113), ch. 218, p. 849, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2021:

(2)(h) amended, (HB 21-1003), ch. 2, p. 4, § 1, effective January 20.

L. 2022:

(2)(g) amended, (HB 22-1413), ch. 425, p. 3014, § 1, effective June 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 17-1113, see section 1 of chapter 218, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

2-3-303.3. Interim committees - repeal.

Commencing on and after June 5, 2013, interim committees may not be requested by a legislative member by bill or resolution. No later than a day certain of a regular legislative session as established in the joint rules of the senate and house of representatives, a legislative member may submit a request in writing to the legislative council created in section 2-3-301 (1) regarding an issue that he or she wishes to study during the next interim between sessions. At minimum, the request must specify:

The scope of the policy issues to be studied;

The number of meetings that would be necessary to study the issues;

The suggested number and composition of legislative members on the interim committee;

Whether other nonlegislative members should have a role in the interim committee;

Whether a task force would be necessary to assist the interim committee in studying the scope of issues and, if so, the members and composition of such a task force; and

An estimate of the maximum number of bills the interim committee will need in order to address the issues studied by the interim committee.

Any interim committee bills are exempt from the five-bill limitation specified in rule 24 of the joint rules of the senate and the house of representatives.

No later than a day certain of a regular legislative session as established in the joint rules of the senate and house of representatives, the director of research of the legislative council shall determine the number of interim committee meetings that may be held within the legislative budget and shall provide that information to the executive committee of the legislative council.

No later than a day certain of a regular legislative session as established in the joint rules of the senate and house of representatives, the legislative council shall meet to review and prioritize requests made by legislative members pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Such review and prioritization must take into account the information provided by the director of research of the legislative council as specified in subsection (2) of this section. The legislative council shall also determine if any of the prioritized interim committees may create a task force. If a task force is approved, such task force shall include no more than two legislative members, one from the majority party and one from the minority party of the interim committee. Legislative members on a task force are only entitled to receive necessary travel costs and are not entitled to per diem pursuant to section 2-2-307. For purposes of carrying out the task force's duties, the legislative council may accept and expend money, gifts, grants, donations, services, and in-kind donations from any public or private entity for any direct or indirect costs associated with the duties of the task force; except that the legislative council may not accept money, gifts, grants, donations, services, or in-kind donations if acceptance is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with state law or requires a predetermined conclusion or result from the task force. The legislative council shall request that the entity offering the money, gift, grant, donation, services, or in-kind donation submit a letter prior to the offer specifying the amount of money, gift, grant, or donation offered, or the estimated value of the services or in-kind donation offered, the period for which the money, gift, grant, donation, services, or in-kind donation is available, and the specific purposes for which the money, gift, grant, donation, services, or in-kind donation is to be used.

The president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the minority and majority leaders of both houses shall appoint the legislative members to any prioritized interim committees or approved task forces.

After the general assembly has adjourned, if an issue is brought to the attention of the executive committee of the legislative council and the executive committee determines that the issue is the result of changed circumstances or new circumstances and is appropriate material for an interim committee that is meeting during that interim between legislative sessions, the executive committee of the legislative council may add the interim committee by adopting a resolution. The resolution must include the items specified in the legislative member's written request for an interim study.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 2105, § 4, effective June 9.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 115, § 1, effective March 15.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-213), ch. 375, p. 1760, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2013:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 13-1299), ch. 382, p. 2242, § 5, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

IP(1), (2), and (3)(a) amended, (SB 14-153), ch. 390, p. 1966, § 30, effective June 6.

L. 2020:

(3)(d) added, (SB 20-214), ch. 200, p. 979, § 1, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(d)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (3)(d), effective July 1, 2021. (See L. 2020, p. 979.)

2-3-304. Director of research - assistants.

The council shall interview persons applying for the position of director of research as to qualifications and ability and shall make recommendations thereon to the executive committee, which shall appoint the director of research as provided in section 2-3-303 (3)(d). The director of research shall be responsible to the council for the collection and assembling of all data and for the preparation of reports, recommendations, and bills. Documents prepared or assembled by the director or employees of the director shall be considered work product, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6.5), C.R.S. The director shall, subject to the general policies of the council, have administrative direction over the activities of the council. The director shall be paid a salary determined by the executive committee in accordance with section 2-3-303 (3)(a). The director shall be an employee of the general assembly and shall not be subject to the state personnel system laws. The director shall be appointed without reference to affiliation and solely on the basis of such director's ability to perform the duties of the position.

The director of research, with approval of the council, may appoint such additional professional, technical, clerical, or other employees necessary to perform the functions assigned to the director of research by the council.

Effective January 1, 1983, the director of research shall contract, pursuant to section 39-1-104 (16), C.R.S., for the property tax study to be conducted as required in said subsection (16).

Effective July 1, 1994, the director of research shall be responsible for the forecasting of adult and juvenile offender populations within the criminal justice system for the general assembly. The division of criminal justice of the department of public safety shall provide information to the director concerning population projections, research data, modeling information, and any other related data requested by the director. The executive directors of the departments of corrections and human services and the state court administrator shall provide information to the director concerning population projections, research data, and the projected long-range needs of the institutions under the control of the executive directors and any other related data requested by the director.

Effective July 1, 1994, the director of research shall be responsible for reviewing any bill which is introduced by the general assembly which affects criminal sentencing and which may result in a net increase or a net decrease in periods of imprisonment in state correctional facilities for the purpose of providing information to the general assembly on the long-term fiscal impact which may result from the passage of the bill, including the increased capital construction costs and increased operating costs for the first five fiscal years following passage.

Repealed.

Pursuant to the process set forth in part 2 of article 70 of title 24, C.R.S., and notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-70-217, C.R.S., if authorized by the executive committee of the legislative council, the director of research, in conjunction with the legislative council print shop, may submit proposals for printing of the first class, as described in section 24-70-203 (1)(a), C.R.S.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 336, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 63-5-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-4.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1398, § 9, effective January 1, 1983.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 306, § 6, effective May 23.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2108, § 9, effective June 9.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1096, § 6, effective May 9; entire section amended, p. 1625, § 12, effective May 31; (4) amended, p. 2614, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(6) added, p. 1155, § 4, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 163, § 21, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(6) repealed, p. 585, § 11, effective May 18.

L. 2008:

(7) added, p. 900, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1348), ch. 358, p. 1863, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2019:

(8) added, (SB 19-248), ch. 269, p. 2518, § 1, effective May 23.

2-3-304.5. Tax policy changes - dynamic model - pilot program - advisory committee.

The director of research shall establish a pilot program for the purpose of developing or procuring a dynamic model to analyze the economic impact of bills introduced by the general assembly that can be used as soon as possible.

The director of research shall investigate all opportunities for developing or procuring a dynamic model, including private, nonprofit, and academic alternatives. Any dynamic model selected by the director shall consider the direct and indirect or secondary economic effects related to the bill, including an estimate of the probable behavioral responses of taxpayers, businesses, and other persons to the proposed tax policy change. It is not necessary that the model be kept at the director's office.

Repealed.

Prior to the first regular session that the dynamic model can be used, the director of research shall notify the executive committee of the legislative council that the dynamic model is ready to be used to analyze bills during the upcoming regular session. If the model is ready, the executive committee shall select no more than ten bills to be analyzed using the dynamic model. Only bills that make a tax policy change are eligible to be analyzed. The analysis of the economic impact using a dynamic model shall be in addition to any fiscal note that is prepared pursuant to the rules of the general assembly.

After the first regular session in which the dynamic model is used, the director of research shall prepare a report evaluating how the dynamic model worked during the session and making recommendations for the use of the dynamic model in future sessions of the general assembly, including the feasibility of expanding the scope of the type of bills for which the dynamic model may be used. The report shall be prepared no later than January 1 of the year following the session in which the dynamic model was used.

It is the intent of the general assembly that for the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2006, no general fund moneys be appropriated for the purpose of implementing this section.

The director of research is authorized to accept gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section. All private and public funds received through gifts, grants, or donations shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the dynamic modeling cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this subsection (5) as the "fund". The moneys in the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation of this section. Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of this section may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the director of research shall not undertake the pilot program unless the balance in the fund is one hundred twenty thousand dollars. If the balance of the fund is at least one hundred twenty thousand dollars, then the director of research shall contract with an independent contractor to help implement the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 703, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

(1), (4), (5)(a), and (5)(c) amended, p. 1617, § 1, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(d) provided for the repeal of subsection (3), effective July 1, 2008. (See L. 2005, p. 703.)

2-3-305. Requests of the governor.

The governor may present, at any meeting of the council, in person or in writing, requests, recommendations, reports, and explanations of the policies of the administration, or any other matters pertaining to the government of the state or its policies.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 337, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 63-5-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-5.

2-3-306. Authority to subpoena witnesses.

The council has the power to subpoena witnesses, to take testimony under oath, and to assemble records and documents, by subpoena duces tecum or otherwise, with the same power and authority as courts of record, and may apply to courts of record for the enforcement of these powers. The sheriff of any county shall serve any subpoena on written order of the council in the same manner as process is served in civil actions. Witnesses subpoenaed to appear before the council shall receive the same fees and expenses as witnesses in civil cases.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 337, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 63-5-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-6.

Cross references:

For fees and expenses allowed in civil actions, see §§ 13-33-102 and 13-33-103; for the authority of the general assembly to compel attendance of witnesses, see § 2-2-313; for the authority of the legislative audit committee to subpoena witnesses, see § 2-3-107.

2-3-307. Minutes of council.

The council shall keep minutes of its meetings which shall be available to all members of the general assembly upon request. Any member of the general assembly has the right to attend any of the meetings of the council and may present his views on any subject which the council may be considering.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 337, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 63-5-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-7.

2-3-308. Recommendations and findings.

The recommendations and findings of the council shall be made available in electronic or hard copy format to each member of the general assembly, to the governor, and to the state library, prior to the next regular session of the general assembly, or at such other times as the council deems necessary, or as requested by the general assembly.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 337, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 63-5-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-8.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 115, § 2, effective March 15.

2-3-309. Reimbursement of members for expenses.

Members of the council shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses in connection with the performance of their duties.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 338, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 63-5-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-9.

Cross references:

For compensation and expenses for members on the council, see § 2-2-307.

2-3-310. Centralized legislative accounting service.

The legislative council shall establish and maintain a centralized legislative accounting service under the supervision of the director of research of the council, which service shall maintain all accounting records, process all vouchers, and prepare all related documents for the legislative department of state government, including all offices and agencies thereof. The council may authorize any and all of such offices and agencies to maintain subsidiary accounting records and to prepare vouchers, but such records and vouchers shall conform to the system of accounting established by said accounting service, and each such office and agency shall make such reports to said service as may be necessary for it to maintain current and complete records for the legislative department.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the procurement and budgetary functions of offices and agencies in the legislative department.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 53, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-4-10.